District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1966

Teaching certificates; renewals; rules and regulations.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1049, Pub. L. 93-407, title II, § 204
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 12, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1113.
1973 Ed., § 31-1513.